test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-aqlmwldw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - aʼlmõldõ: # Verb 54 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Inf: aʼlmõldõ
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ger: aʼlmõldõs
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Sup: aʼlmõldõm
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Sup+Ine: aʼlmõldõmõs
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Sup+Ela: aʼlmõldõmõst
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Sup+Tra: aʼlmõldõmõks
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Sup+Abe: aʼlmõldõmõt
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aʼlmõldõb
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aʼlmõldõt
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aʼlmõldõbõd
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aʼlmõldiz
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [aʼlmõldizt, aʼlmõldiztõ]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [aʼlmõldizt, aʼlmõldiztõ]
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlmõld
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Cond+Sg3: aʼlmõldõks
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: aʼlmõld
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aʼlmõld
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: aʼlmõldõgid
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Jus+Sg3: aʼlmõldõg
     aʼlmõldõ+V+Quo+Sg3: aʼlmõldiji
     aʼlmõldõ+V+ActPrfPrc: aʼlmõldõn
     aʼlmõldõ+V+PssPrfPrc: aʼlmõldõd
